Wisconsin, session 2025, AB608.
do enact as follows:AB608,15Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 6insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB608,29Section 2. 20.285 (1) (ct) of the statutes is created to read:AB608,2,131020.285 (1) (ct) Student success and retention. As a continuing appropriation, 11the amounts in the schedule to provide additional support for student success and 12retention efforts, including academic advising and the administration of other 13programs to promote student success and retention.AB608,314Section 3. 20.292 (1) (er) of the statutes is created to read:AB608,2,171520.292 (1) (er) Student success and retention. As a continuing appropriation, 16the amounts in the schedule for grants to technical college district boards under s. 1738.04 (33).AB608,418Section 4. 38.04 (33) of the statutes is created to read:AB608,3,21938.04 (33) Student success and retention. From the appropriation under 20s. 20.292 (1) (er), the board shall award grants to district boards to provide 21additional support for student success and retention efforts, including academic 1advising and the administration of other programs to promote student success and 2retention.AB608,3,33